Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1001
Service of process.

The performance of any service in connection with exploring for oil and gas, drilling wells therefor, regardless of whether such wells be dry, development of oil and gas interests, and operating and servicing oil and gas properties by (1) a nonresident of the State of Nebraska or (2) an agent or employer of any such persons, shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for exercise of personal jurisdiction over such person in any action arising out of the activities within the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1961, c. 281, § 1, p. 819;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 76.